Hawaii statutes.
§235-2.35 Operation of certain
Internal Revenue Code provisions not operative under section 235-2.3.
The following sections of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, shall be operative for purposes of this chapter:

(1) Section 6038D (with respect to information with
respect to foreign financial assets). With respect to persons required to
report information under this section, section 6662(j) (with respect to
imposition of accuracy-related penalties on underpayments) and section 6501(e)(1)(A)(ii)
(with respect to limitations on assessment and collection) shall also be
operative for purposes of this chapter and shall be applied consistently with
the correlating provisions of sections 231-36.6 and 235-111;

(2) Section 6045B (with respect to returns relating
to actions affecting basis in securities); and

(3) Section 6050W (with respect to returns relating
to payments made in settlement of payment card and third party network
transactions). [L 2010, c 112, §2; am L 2011, c 43, §5 and c 91, §3; am L 2012,
c 179, §3]

Note

The 2012 amendment applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2011. L 2012, c 179, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next